apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="lucrăto/r_cu_ziua__n">
     
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rul<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rului<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rii<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rilor<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>area<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arei<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arele<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arelor<b/>cu<b/>ziua</l>
          <r>r<b/>cu<b/>ziua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

   </pardef>


 <pardef n="tăieto/r_de_lemne__n">
     
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>r<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rul<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rului<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rii<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rilor<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>area<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arei<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arele<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arelor<b/>de<b/>lemne</l>
          <r>r<b/>de<b/>lemne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
          
    </pardef>

<pardef n="atașa/t_de_presă__n">
     
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tul<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tului<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ți<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ții<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ți<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ților<b/>de<b/>presă</l>
          <r>t<b/>de<b/>presă<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

<e lm="lucrător cu ziua" a="mioara">
        <i>lucrăto</i>
        <par n="lucrăto/r_cu_ziua__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="tăietor de lemne" a="mioara">
        <i>tăieto</i>
        <par n="tăieto/r_de_lemne__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="atașat de presă" a="mioara">
        <i>atașa</i>
        <par n="atașa/t_de_presă__n"/>
      </e>
